
P22487

No.1 Vehicle
Speed Sensor

Combination
Meter

4−pulse 4 −pulse

Engine ECU

A05957

CombinationMeter

19
SB SPD

J27 (LHD)
J29 (RHD)
Junction
Connector

5V

E1

Engine ECU

SB

J19 (LHD)
Junction
Connector

E E
IU1
18

V
B B

15
V

(RHD)

C16

Speed

Sensor
V

E10

−DIAGNOSTICS ENGINE
DI−77

2UZ−FEENGINE(RM630E)

DTC P0500/42 Vehicle Speed Sensor Malfunction

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
TheNo.1vehiclespeedsensoroutputsa4 − pulsesignal forevery revolutionof the rotorshaft,which is
rotated by the transmission output shaft via the driven gear. After this signal is converted into a more precise
rectangular wavefrom by the waveform shaping circuit inside the combination meter, it is then transmitted
to the engine ECU. The engien ECU determines the vehicle speed based on the frequency of these pulse
signals.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

P0500/42

Novehiclespeedsensorsignal toengineECUundercondi-
tions (a) and (b):
(a) Neutral start switch is OFF
(b) Vehicle is being driven

SOpenorshort inNo.1vehiclespeedsensorcircuit
SNo.1vehiclespeedsensor
SCombinationmeter
SEngineECU

WIRING DIAGRAM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
Read freeze framedatausinghand −held tester.Because freeze framerecords theengineconditionswhen
the malfunction is detected, when troubleshooting it is useful for determining whether the vehicle was run-
ningorstopped, theenginewarmedupornot, theair −
fuel ratio leanor rich,etc.at the timeof themalfunction.
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1 Check operation of speedometer.

CHECK:
Drive the vehicle and check if the operation of the speedmeter in the combination meter is normal.
HINT:
The vehicle speed sensor is operating normally if the speedometer display is normal.

NG Check speedometer circuit.

OK

2 Check voltage between terminal SPD of engine ECU connector and body ground.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Shift the shift lever to neutral.
(c) Jack up a rear wheels on one side.
(d) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Measure voltage between terminal SPD of the engine ECU
connector and body ground when the wheel is turned slowly.
OK:

Voltage is generated intermittently.

NG Check and repair harness and connector be-
tween combination meter and engine ECU.

OK

Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN−1 9) .


